Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1422XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1422XD (3) 91
ss/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 39A.7, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
39A.7 Election misconduct —— investigation.
1. The attorney general county sheriff, or other law
enforcement agency with jurisdiction, shall investigate
allegations of election misconduct reported to the attorney
general. Election misconduct by an election official shall
also be investigated for prosecution under chapter 721.
2. Upon the completion of an investigation required by
this section, the attorney general county sheriff, or other
law enforcement agency with jurisdiction, shall submit the
results of the investigation, including the report from the
law enforcement agency, to the attorney general and the state
commissioner, and the attorney general shall explain whether
the attorney general will pursue charges. Any information that
is requested by or in the possession of the state commissioner
pursuant to this chapter remains a confidential record pursuant
to section 22.7, subsection 5.
Sec. 2. Section 43.18, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
9. A statement that the candidate is aware that the
candidate is disqualified from holding office if the candidate
has been convicted of a felony or other infamous crime and
the candidate’s rights have not been restored by the governor
or by the president of the United States. This subsection
does not apply to candidates for federal office. The state
commissioner shall prescribe a separate affidavit of candidacy
for candidates for federal office.
Sec. 3. Section 43.67, subsection 2, paragraph i, Code 2025,
is amended to read as follows:
i. A statement that the candidate is aware that the
candidate is disqualified from holding office if the candidate
has been convicted of a felony or other infamous crime and
the candidate’s rights have not been restored by the governor
or by the president of the United States. This paragraph
LSB 1422XD (3) 91
-1- ss/ns 1/8

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
does not apply to candidates for federal office. The state
commissioner shall prescribe a separate affidavit of candidacy
for candidates for federal office.
Sec. 4. Section 44.3, subsection 2, paragraph i, Code 2025,
is amended to read as follows:
i. A statement that the candidate is aware that the
candidate is disqualified from holding office if the candidate
has been convicted of a felony or other infamous crime and
the candidate’s rights have not been restored by the governor
or by the president of the United States. This paragraph
does not apply to candidates for federal office. The state
commissioner shall prescribe a separate affidavit of candidacy
for candidates for federal office.
Sec. 5. Section 45.3, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
9. A statement that the candidate is aware that the
candidate is disqualified from holding office if the candidate
has been convicted of a felony or other infamous crime and
the candidate’s rights have not been restored by the governor
or by the president of the United States. This subsection
does not apply to candidates for federal office. The state
commissioner shall prescribe a separate affidavit of candidacy
for candidates for federal office.
Sec. 6. Section 47.1, subsections 1, 6, 7, and 8, Code 2025,
are amended to read as follows:
1. The secretary of state is designated as the state
commissioner of elections and shall supervise the activities of
the county commissioners of elections. There is established
within the office of the secretary of state a division of
elections which shall be under the direction of the state
commissioner of elections. The state commissioner of
elections may appoint a person to be in charge of the division
of elections who shall perform the duties assigned by the
state commissioner of elections. The state commissioner of
elections shall prescribe uniform election practices and
LSB 1422XD (3) 91
-2- ss/ns 2/8

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
procedures, shall prescribe the necessary forms required
for the conduct of elections, shall assign a number to each
proposed constitutional amendment and statewide public measure
for identification purposes, and shall adopt rules, pursuant to
chapter 17A, to carry out this section. The state commissioner
of elections may issue guidance and directives that is are not
subject to the rulemaking process to clarify election laws and
rules.
6. The state commissioner may, at the state commissioner’s
discretion, examine the records of a commissioner to evaluate
complaints and to ensure compliance with the provisions of
chapters 39 through 53. This examination shall include but not
be limited to assessments conducted or authorized by private or
government entities to evaluate a county’s security readiness
for elections-related technology or physical facilities. The
state commissioner shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to
require a commissioner to provide written explanations related
to examinations conducted pursuant to this subsection. Any
information that is requested by or in the possession of the
state commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall not lose its
confidential status pursuant to section 22.7, subsection 50.
7. The state commissioner may share information a county
provides to an appropriate government agency to safeguard
against cybersecurity or physical threats. A county
commissioner of elections shall notify the state commissioner
when the county commissioner’s office is involved in physical
or cybersecurity assessments performed by a federal or state
agency or other entity.
8. The state commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 17A to create minimum security protocols applicable
to county commissioners of elections and vendors utilized
by the state commissioner and county commissioners of
elections. If a county fails to adhere to these protocols,
the state commissioner may limit access to the statewide voter
registration system. If a vendor fails to adhere to these
LSB 1422XD (3) 91
-3- ss/ns 3/8

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
protocols, the state commissioner may limit access to election
infrastructure.
Sec. 7. Section 47.2, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. The county auditor of each county is designated as the
county commissioner of elections in each county. The county
commissioner of elections shall conduct voter registration
pursuant to chapter 48A and conduct all elections within the
county. The county commissioner of elections does not possess
home rule powers with respect to the exercise of powers or
duties related to the conduct of elections prescribed by
statute or rule, or guidance or directives issued pursuant to
section 47.1.
Sec. 8. Section 49.25, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. The commissioner shall determine pursuant to section
49.26, subsection 2, in advance of an election whether ballots
voted in that election shall be counted by automatic tabulating
equipment or by precinct election officials. If automatic
tabulating equipment will be used, the commissioner shall
furnish voting equipment for use by voters with disabilities.
Sec. 9. Section 49.26, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
49.26 Commissioner to decide method Methods of voting ——
counting of ballots.
1. In all elections regulated by this chapter, the voting
shall be by paper ballots printed and distributed as provided
by law, or by voting systems meeting the requirements of
chapter 52.
2. a. The commissioner shall determine in advance of each
election conducted for a city of three thousand five hundred or
less population or for any school district whether the ballots
will be counted by automatic tabulating equipment or by the
precinct election officials. In making such a determination,
the commissioner shall consider voter turnout for recent
LSB 1422XD (3) 91
-4- ss/ns 4/8

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
similar elections and factors considered likely to affect voter
turnout for the forthcoming election.
b. If the commissioner concludes, pursuant to paragraph “a”,
that voting will probably be so light as to make counting of
ballots by the precinct election officials less expensive than
preparation and use of automatic tabulating equipment, paper
ballots may be used, subject to paragraph “c”. If paper ballots
are used, the commissioner shall use ballots and instructions
similar to those used when the ballots are counted by automatic
tabulating equipment.
c. Notwithstanding a determination by the commissioner
pursuant to paragraph “b”, upon receipt of a petition signed by
not less than one hundred eligible electors, the commissioner
shall count the ballots at an election described in paragraph
“a” using automatic tabulating equipment. A petition filed
under this paragraph must be received by the commissioner
not later than 5:00 p.m. on the forty-second day before the
election.
Sec. 10. NEW SECTION. 49.29 Electronic election register
and poll book.
1. The commissioner may use an electronic election register
or election poll book in lieu of a paper register or poll book
if the electronic election register or poll book is a product
that has been certified for use in this state by the state
commissioner.
2. The state commissioner shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 17A for certification standards for electronic election
registers and election poll books. The certification standards
must include operational and security standards.
Sec. 11. Section 50.24, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. The board shall certify an election canvass summary
report prepared by the commissioner. The election canvass
summary report shall include the results of the election,
including scatterings, overvotes, and undervotes, by precinct
LSB 1422XD (3) 91
-5- ss/ns 5/8

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
for each contest and public measure that appeared on the ballot
of the election being canvassed. However, if paper ballots are
used pursuant to section 49.26, the election canvass summary
report shall not include overvotes and undervotes.
Sec. 12. Section 50.50, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 3. The state commissioner may, at the state
commissioner’s discretion, call for a recount of any election
and advise recount boards convened pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 13. Section 52.1, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. At all elections conducted under chapter 49, and at
any other election unless the commissioner directs otherwise
pursuant to section 49.26, votes shall be cast, registered,
recorded, and counted by means of optical scan voting systems,
in accordance with this chapter.
Sec. 14. Section 54.5, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 5. An objection to a nomination made under
this section on any grounds other than the legal sufficiency
of the certificate of nomination shall not be sustained. The
certificate of nomination shall be presumed valid.